Missouri, session 2026, SB1710.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160 and 161, RSMo, are amended by
adding thereto two new sections, to be known as sections 160.044
and 161.044, to read as follows:
160.044. 1. No high school shall begin mandated
instruction for students earlier than 8:30 a.m. This
requirement shall be in effect at all school districts
statewide beginning with the earliest of:
(1) The commencement of the 2027-28 school year; or
(2) The expiration of the school district's existing
collective bargaining agreement establishing school day
start times.
2. A school district facing unique challenges as a
result of the requirements of subsection 1 of this section
may apply to the department of elementary and secondary
education for a waiver from such requirements. The
department shall establish a form that districts may use for
this purpose. To be eligible for a waiver, a school
district shall supply substantial evidence of significant
hardship due to factors including, but not limited to,
operations, funding, or pupil transportation.

SB 1710 2
3. School districts may coordinate with the department
of elementary and secondary education if they require
assistance with redesigning bus routes or adjusting school
schedules to implement the requirements of subsection 1 of
this section.
4. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
161.044. 1. The "Missouri Sleep and Education
Advisory Task Force" is hereby established within the
department of elementary and secondary education.
2. The task force shall consist of the following
twenty members:
(1) The commissioner of education or the
commissioner's designee;
(2) The director of the department of health and
senior services or such director's designee;
(3) A sleep scientist or neurologist, to be appointed
by the director of the department of health and senior
services;

SB 1710 3
(4) An individual responsible for planning and
organizing pupil transportation services for a school
district or school districts, to be appointed by the
commissioner of education;
(5) The following twelve individuals, to be appointed
by the governor from among school districts representing a
variety of organizational types and operational challenges:
(a) The superintendent of an urban school district;
(b) The superintendent of a seven-director school
district;
(c) The superintendent of a metropolitan school
district;
(d) A high school teacher currently employed by an
urban school district;
(e) A high school teacher currently employed by a
seven-director school district;
(f) A high school teacher currently employed by a
metropolitan school district;
(g) A parent of a high school student currently
enrolled in an urban school district;
(h) A parent of a high school student currently
enrolled in a seven-director school district;
(i) A parent of a high school student currently
enrolled in a metropolitan school district;
(j) A high school student currently enrolled in an
urban school district;
(k) A high school student currently enrolled in a
seven-director school district; and
(l) A high school student currently enrolled in a
metropolitan school district;
(6) A member of the senate, appointed by the president
pro tempore of the senate;

SB 1710 4
(7) A member of the senate, appointed by the senate
minority floor leader;
(8) A member of the house of representatives,
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives; and
(9) A member of the house of representatives,
appointed by the house minority floor leader.
3. Members of the task force shall serve a four-year
term and may be reappointed. Any vacancy on the task force
shall be filled in the same manner as in the original
appointment.
4. Members of the task force shall elect a chair from
among the membership of the task force. The task force
shall meet as needed to complete its recommendations and
submit its report as described in subsection 5 of this
section. Members of the task force shall serve without
compensation. No school district policy or administrative
action shall require any employee to use personal leave or
incur a reduction in pay for participating on the task
force. No school district policy or administrative action
shall penalize any student for participating on the task
force.
5. The task force shall:
(1) Collect feedback from among the task force
membership and education stakeholders across the state
regarding best practices for school start times, taking into
account impacts of a later start time on student health,
school operations and finances, and the local community;
(2) Collect data from school districts across the
state on changes in student attendance, tardiness, grades,
and disciplinary outcomes before and after the
implementation of the provisions of section 160.044. Based

SB 1710 5
on this data, the task force may recommend changes to state
law and regulations as needed; and
(3) On or before December thirty-first of each year,
submit a report on its findings and recommendations to the
governor, president pro tempore of the senate, speaker of
the house of representatives, the joint committee on
education, the state board of education, and the state board
of health and senior services.
6. The department of elementary and secondary
education may promulgate rules to implement the provisions
of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
the authority delegated in this section shall become
effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓